Maine, session 132, LD1131.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §8055, sub-§3, as amended by PL 1985, c. 506, Pt. A, §4, is further
amended to read:
3. Receipt of petition. Within 60 days after receipt of a petition, the agency shall
either notify the petitioner in writing of its denial, stating the reasons therefor, or initiate
appropriate rule-making proceedings. Whenever a petition to adopt or modify a rule is
submitted by 150 or more a number of registered voters of the State that is equal to or
greater than 1% of the total number of votes cast for Governor at the last gubernatorial
election preceding the filing of the petition, the agency shall initiate appropriate rulemaking
rule-making proceedings within 60 days after receipt of the petition. The petition must be
verified and certified in the same manner provided in Title 21‑A, section 354, subsection
7, prior to its presentation to the agency. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are
major substantive rules and subject to legislative review in accordance with subchapter
2-A.